Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.715

Identification—Cooperation with other criminal justice agencies.

The section shall, consistent with the procedures set forth in chapter 152, Laws of 1972 ex. sess., cooperate with all other criminal justice agencies within or without the state, in an exchange of information regarding convicted criminals and those suspected of or wanted for the commission of crimes to the end that proper identification may rapidly be made and the ends of justice served.

[ 2006 c 294 s 3; 1989 c 334 s 8; 1985 c 201 s 10; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 4.]